en: Buffalo mozzarella
bg: Биволска моцарела
de: Büffelmozzarella
es: Mozzarella de búfalo, Mozzarella de búfala
fi: Puhvelimozzarella
fr: Mozzarella de bufflonne
hr: Buffalo mozzarella
it: Mozzarella di bufala
nl: Buffelmozzarellas

en: Mozzarella di Bufala Campana
de: Mozzarella di Bufala Campana
fr: Mozzarella di Bufala Campana
hr: Mozzarella di bufala campana
it: Mozzarella di Bufala Campana
nl: Buffelmozzarellas uit Campana

en: Frozen mozzarella
fr: Mozzarella surgelée

en: Burrata
xx: Burrate
bg: Бурата
fr: Burrata
ja: ブッラータ

en: Cow burrata
bg: Бурата от краве мляко
es: Burrata de vaca
fr: Burrata de vache
hr: Krava burrata
it: Burrata di mucca

it: Burrata di Andria
xx: Burrata di Andria

en: Buffalo burrata
bg: Бурата от биволско мляко
es: Burrata de búfala
fr: Burrata de bufflonne
hr: Buffalo burrata
it: Burrata di bufala

it: Murazzano
ja: ムラッツァーノ

en: Parmigiano-Reggiano, Parmesan
xx: Parmigiano Reggiano
bg: Пармиджано-Реджано, Пармезан
de: Parmesan
es: Parmigiano-Reggiano, Parmesano
fi: Parmigiano-Reggiano, Parmesaani
fr: Parmigiano Reggiano, parmesan
hr: Parmigiano-reggiano
it: Parmigiano Reggiano
ja: パルミジャーノ・レッジャーノ
lt: Parmezanas
nl: Parmigiano-Reggiano, Parmezaan, Parmezaanse kaas
pl: Parmezan

en: Pecorino
xx: Pecorino
bg: Пекорино
de: Pecorino
fi: Pecorino
fr: Pecorino
hr: Pecorino
it: Pecorino
ja: ペコリーノ
nl: Pecorino

en: Pecorino Romano
xx: Pecorino Romano
de: Pecorino Romano
fi: Pecorino Romano
fr: Pecorino Romano
hr: Pecorino romano
it: Pecorino Romano
ja: ペコリーノ・ロマーノ
nl: Pecorino Romano

en: Piave
xx: Piave

en: Ricotta
xx: Ricotta
bg: Рикота
de: Ricotta
es: Ricotta
fi: ricotta
fr: Ricotta
it: Ricotta
ja: リコッタ
nl: Ricotta

en: Robiola
xx: Robiola
es: Robiola
fr: Robiola
hr: Robiola
it: Robiola

en: Scamorza
xx: Scamorza
bg: Скарморца
de: Scamorza
fi: Scamorza
fr: Scamorza
hr: Scamorza
it: Scamorza
ja: スカモルツァ
nl: Scamorza

en: Smoked scamorza
fr: Scamorza fumée

en: Taleggio
xx: Taleggio
de: Taleggio
fi: Taleggio
fr: Taleggio
hr: Taleggio
it: Taleggio
ja: タレッジョ
nl: Taleggio

en: Tomino
it: Tomino

en: Hungarian cheeses, Cheeses from Hungary
fr: Fromages hongrois

en: Lithuanian cheeses, cheeses from Lithuania
de: Litauischer Käse
fr: Fromages lithuaniens, Fromages de Lithuanie
hr: Litvanski sirevi
nl: Litouwse kazen